Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 2. Apartment Ownership and Conveyancing.

Sec. 34.07.080.
Apartment classified as real property.

Each apartment, together with its undivided interest in the common areas and facilities is not considered an intangible or a security or any interest therein but for all purposes constitutes and is classified as real property under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.090.
Apartment ownership and possession.

Each apartment owner shall have exclusive ownership and possession of the owner’s apartment, but any apartment may be owned by husband and wife as tenants by the entirety or may be commonly owned by more than one person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Collateral references. —

Right of condominium association’s management or governing body to inspect individual units. 41 ALR4th 730.

Sec. 34.07.100.
Separation of apartment ownership from common areas and facilities ownership prohibited.

The percentage of the undivided interest in the common areas and facilities may not be separated from the apartment to which it appertains even though the interest is not expressly mentioned or described in the conveyance or other instrument.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.110.
Release or partial release from encumbrance affecting apartment with first conveyance; partial waiver of lien claims.

At the time of the first conveyance of each apartment, every mortgage, deed of trust, lien, or other encumbrance affecting the apartment, including the percentage of undivided interest of the apartment in the common areas and facilities, shall be paid and satisfied of record, or the apartment being conveyed and its percentage of undivided interest in the common areas and facilities shall be released by a recorded partial release.

A partial waiver of lien claims created under AS

34.35.050

—

34.35.120

(mechanics liens) on unsold apartments may be obtained by following the procedures specified in AS

34.35.119

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963; am § 18 ch 175 SLA 1978)

Sec. 34.07.120.
Liability of grantee for unpaid common expenses at time of conveyance.

In a voluntary conveyance the grantee of an apartment is jointly and severally liable with the grantor for all unpaid assessments against the latter for the grantor’s share of the common expenses up to the time of the grantor’s conveyance, without prejudice to the grantee’s right to recover from the grantor the amounts paid on the assessments by the grantee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Collateral references. —

Liability of owner of unit in condominium, recreational development, time-share property, or the like for assessment in support of common facilities levied against and unpaid by prior owner. 39 ALR4th 114.

Sec. 34.07.130.
Person obtaining possession upon foreclosure of apartment not liable for common expenses.

If a mortgagee of a recorded mortgage or a trustee of a recorded deed of trust or other purchaser of an apartment obtains possession of the apartment as a result of foreclosure of the mortgage or deed of trust, the possessor, and successors and assigns of the possessor are not liable for the share of the common expenses or assessments by the association of apartment owners chargeable to the apartment that became due before possession.
This unpaid share of common expenses or assessments is a common expense collectable from all of the apartment owners including the possessor and successors and assigns of the possessor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.140.
Grantee entitled to statement of unpaid assessments.

A grantee is entitled to a statement from the manager or board of directors setting out the amount of the unpaid assessments against the grantor.
The grantee is not liable for, nor is the apartment conveyed subject to a lien for, any unpaid assessments against the grantor in excess of the amount in the statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.150.
Contents of apartment deed.

An apartment deed must include

a description of the land as provided in AS

34.07.020

, or the post office address of the property, and in either case, the date of recording of the declaration and its volume, page, and receiving number;

the apartment number of the apartment in the declaration and any other data necessary for its proper identification;

a statement of the use for which the apartment is intended and any restrictions on its use;

the percentage of undivided interest appertaining to the apartment, the common areas and facilities and limited common areas and facilities appertaining to it, if any; and

any further details that the grantor and grantee may set out consistent with the declaration and with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)